Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-5] Information to subscribers.
(a) The dental insurer shall provide to its subscribers a list of providers
and participating providers, upon enrollment and reenrollment.

(b) Every dental insurer shall provide to its
subscribers notice of any material change in the operation of the organization
that will affect them directly within thirty days of the material change.

(c) The dental insurer shall provide to
subscribers information on how dental care services may be obtained, where
additional information on access to dental care services may be obtained, a
description of the internal grievance procedures, and a telephone number for a
subscriber to contact the dental insurer at no cost to the subscriber.

(d) For the purpose of this section, "material
change" means any major change in provider or participating provider
agreements. [L 2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next